Maryland, session 2025, HB0856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1A–29.
(a) There is a Racetrack Facility Renewal Account under the authority of the
State Racing Commission.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0856*

HOUSE BILL 856
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d)(1) of this section, funds from the Account
shall be used to provide a grant to the holder of a license to hold a race meeting in the State
for racetrack facility capital construction and improvements.
(d) (1) The amount of funds made available from the Racetrack Facility
Renewal Account shall be allocated as follows:
(i) [1. for fiscal year 2021, 80% to be deposited in the Racing and
Community Development Facilities Fund established under § 10–657.3 of the Economic
Development Article; and
2.] for fiscal year 2022 and thereafter, 80% to the State
Lottery Fund established under § 9–120 of this title; and
(ii) 1. FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR THAT ROSECROFT RACEWAY
IS USED FOR LIVE RACING, subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, 20% to Rosecroft
Raceway and Ocean Downs Race Course according to a formula established in regulations
adopted by the State Racing Commission; AND
2. FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR AFTER ROSECROFT
RACEWAY IS CLOSED AND NO LONGER USED FOR LIVE RACING, SUBJECT TO
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
A. 10% TO OCEAN DOWNS RACE COURSE; AND
B. 10% TO RACE COURSES WITHIN THE FAIR HILL
NATURAL RESOURCES MANAGEMENT AREA.
(2) Of the amount available to Rosecroft Raceway OR THE RACE COURSES
WITHIN THE FAIR HILL NATURAL RESOURCES MANAGEMENT AREA from the
Racetrack Facility Renewal Account under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection[:
(i) the unencumbered fund balance, including accrued interest,
existing as of June 30, 2020, shall be transferred to the Racing and Community
Development Facilities Fund established under § 10–646.3 of the Economic Development
Article; and
(ii)], subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, for fiscal year [2021]
2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, $200,000 shall be transferred annually to Employ
Prince George’s, Inc. for workforce development and small, minority, and women–owned
business development.
(3) (i) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the funds
transferred to Employ Prince George’s, Inc. shall supplement, and not supplant, funds
otherwise available for Employ Prince George’s, Inc.

HOUSE BILL 856 3
(ii) If Employ Prince George’s, Inc. is unable to expend the funds
transferred under paragraph [(2)(ii)] (2) of this subsection during the 12–month period
after which Employ Prince George’s, Inc. received the funds, Employ Prince George’s, Inc.
shall partner with similar organizations located within Prince George’s County to expend
the balance of the funds from that period to encourage workforce development and small,
minority, and women–owned business development.
(4) For fiscal year 2026, the Governor shall include in the annual budget
bill an appropriation of $4,500,000 to the Racetrack Facility Renewal Account to be made
available to Rosecroft Raceway.
(e) In order to obtain a grant, a holder of a license to hold a race meeting in the
State shall:
(1) submit a capital construction plan to be implemented within a specified
time frame to the State Racing Commission for approval; and
(2) provide and expend a matching fund.
(h) (1) The State Racing Commission shall adopt regulations to implement the
provisions of this section, including regulations to:
(i) address minimum criteria for the types of improvements to be
made by the holder of a license; and
(ii) establish a formula to allocate funds under subsection [(d)(2)]
(D)(1)(II)1 of this section between Rosecroft Raceway and Ocean Downs Race Course.
(2) If Rosecroft Raceway is closed and no longer used for live racing the
unencumbered fund balance, including accrued interest, of the amount available to
Rosecroft Raceway from the Racetrack Facility Renewal Account under subsection (d)(1)(ii)
of this section shall be made available, EQUALLY, to Ocean Downs Race Course AND THE
RACE COURSES WITHIN THE FAIR HILL NATURAL RESOURCES MANAGEMENT
AREA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.